Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-904
Department; programs and services; duties.

The department shall establish and maintain comprehensive support services to aid victims of domestic abuse and to provide prevention and treatment programs to aid victims of domestic abuse, their families, and abusers.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 4.